Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-140
National Guard; oaths; commissioned officers may administer.

All commissioned officers of the Nebraska National Guard shall be authorized and empowered to administer oaths and affirmations necessary for the administration of military business.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 63, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 3962;

C.S.1922, § 3360;

C.S.1929, § 55-179;

R.S.1943, § 55-119;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 38, p. 1594;

Laws 1993, LB 170, § 3.